District of Columbia statutes.
11-709

Reports.

Each judge shall submit to the chief judge such reports and data as the chief judge may request. Each judge shall submit a monthly written report to the chief judge and the Commission on Judicial Disabilities and Tenure which shall be in a form prescribed by the chief judge after consultation with the Commission and which shall set forth the following:

(1)

The number of days’ attendance in court of the judge during the month covered.

(2)

The division of the court which the judge attended.

(3)

The number of hours per day of the judge’s attendance.

(4)

The number and type of matters disposed of by the judge during the month covered.

(5)

Such other data as the chief judge may require.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 480, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, §§ 1(b)(5), (6), 108 Stat. 713
This section is referenced in § 11-1730.
1981 Ed., § 11-709.
1973 Ed., § 11-709.